Utah, session 2026, HB140.
Section 1. Section 72-4-224 is enacted to read:72-4-224. Officer Joseph Shinners Memorial Boulevard.(1)There is established the Officer Joseph Shinners Memorial Boulevard composed of the portion of State Street within Utah County between 2000 North in Provo and 500 W. Lakeview Parkway in Provo.(2)In addition to other official designations, the Department of Transportation shall designate the portion of the highway identified in Subsection (1) as the Officer Joseph Shinners Memorial Boulevard on future state highway maps.(3)As soon as practicable, the Department of Transportation shall install appropriate signs along portions of the highway indicating the designation as the Officer Joseph Shinners Memorial Boulevard as described in Subsection (1).

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.